Louisiana, session 2026, SB220.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 43:24(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§24. Acts; numbering; printing; publication
* * *
C. The secretary of state shall take all necessary actions to cause transmit the
acts and joint resolutions of the legislature to be made accessible on the Internet
website or portal of the Official Journal of the State within the time limits established
by R.S. 43:81.
* * *
Section 2. Section 5 of Act No. 374 of the 2025 Regular Session of the Legislature
is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Section 5. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027 2028.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.